Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5927XS (7) 91 dg/ko S.F. 2362 Section 1. LONG-TERM CARE WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS INTERIM 1 COMMITTEE. 2 1. A long-term care workforce solutions interim committee 3 shall convene during the 2026 legislative interim to review all 4 of the following: 5 a. The adequacy and availability of long-term care services 6 in the state and how the state may improve those services. 7 b. The training, education, and skills necessary for an 8 effective long-term care workforce. 9 c. The best means by which the state can support the 10 recruitment, training, and retention of long-term care workers. 11 d. The current rates at which long-term care workers are 12 compensated in this state and recommendations for increasing 13 long-term care worker compensation. 14 e. The current turnover rates in the long-term care 15 workforce, the main reasons for turnover among long-term care 16 workers, and the cost to the state to remedy issues caused by 17 long-term care worker turnover. 18 2. The interim committee shall consist of the following ex 19 officio voting members: 20 a. One member appointed by the majority leader of the 21 senate. 22 b. One member appointed by the senate minority leader. 23 c. One member appointed by the house of representatives 24 majority leader. 25 d. One member appointed by the house of representatives 26 minority leader. 27 3. The interim committee shall consist of the following 28 nonvoting members: 29 a. Three members representing long-term care consumers and 30 the families of long-term care consumers. 31 b. One member representing the office of long-term care 32 ombudsman. 33 c. One member representing the department of inspections, 34 appeals, and licensing. 35 -1- LSB 5927XS (7) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 2362 d. One member representing the department of health and 1 human services. 2 e. One member representing the department of workforce 3 development. 4 f. One member representing area agencies on aging. 5 g. One member representing Iowa caregivers association. 6 h. One member representing leading age Iowa. 7 i. One member representing the Iowa health care 8 association. 9 j. One member representing the Iowa association of 10 community providers. 11 k. Two members representing long-term care service 12 providers. 13 4. No later than January 11, 2027, the interim committee 14 shall submit a report with the committeeâs findings and 15 recommendations to the chairperson and the ranking member of 16 the senate committee on health and human services, the house 17 committee on health and human services, and to the legislative 18 fiscal committee. 19 Sec. 2. LEGISLATIVE FISCAL COMMITTEE REVIEW. The 20 legislative fiscal committee established in section 2.45 shall 21 hold a meeting during the 2027 legislative interim. During 22 the meeting, the committee shall review the report submitted 23 by the long-term care workforce solutions interim committee 24 to determine how to best achieve the long-term care workforce 25 solutions interim committeeâs recommendations. The legislative 26 fiscal committee shall submit a report of its findings and 27 recommendations to the general assembly no later than October 28 31, 2027. 29